South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4966.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  (A) There is created a study committee to study the cost and feasibility of installing fencing, netting, or other safety barriers on highway bridges to deter people from climbing onto and subsequently jumping from these structures and taking their lives. (B) The study committee shall provide a report that addresses the installation of highway bridge safety barriers designed to discourage and prevent suicidal behavior. (C)(1) The study committee is composed of six members, consisting of: (a) the Secretary of Transportation, or his designee; (b) the Chairman of the Commission of the Department of Transportation, or his designee; (c) a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives; (d) a member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate; (e) a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the House Minority Leader; and (f) a member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Minority Leader. (2) A vacancy in membership of the study committee must be filled in the manner of original appointment. (3) Members of the committee shall serve without per diem, mileage, or other compensation generally provided to members of boards and commissions. (D)(1) The House Education and Public Works Committee and the Senate Transportation Committee shall provide appropriate staffing for the study committee. (2) The study committee may obtain data or other information from state agencies that is relevant to the purposes of this study committee; provided, however, only aggregated data with no personally identifiable data may be obtained by the study committee. Any state agency that receives a request pursuant to this joint resolution shall respond promptly and provide the requested data or other information. (E) The study committee shall provide a report with findings and recommendations to the General Assembly by January 1, 2027. The study committee shall dissolve upon providing its report to the General Assembly or on January 1, 2027, whichever occurs first. SECTION 2.  This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----